Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
CHAPTER 43 Auditor of Public Accounts

43.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Auditor” means the Auditor of Public Accounts.

“Budget unit” means a department or other unit of organization for which separate appropriations are made from those for any other organization unit.

“State agency” means any state officer, department, board, commission, institution, division, or other person or functional group that is authorized to exercise or does exercise any executive or administrative jurisdiction, powers, duties, rights or obligations of the state government conferred or imposed by law or exercised, performed, or discharged by legal authority in compliance with law.

“Writing” or “written” means letters, words, or numbers, or their equivalent, set down by handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, magnetic impulse, mechanical or electronic recording, or other form of data compilation.

History.

1992b-2, 4618-69; 1998, ch. 120, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

43.020.
Location of office of Auditor.

The Auditor shall keep his or her office at the seat of government.

History.

138, 141: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 26, § 4; 1946, ch. 27, § 19; 1966, ch. 255, § 51; 2020 ch. 59, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Constitution providing only that all state officers shall reside within the Commonwealth, a state officer residing within the State of Kentucky may legally reside, where commuting time is less than an hour, in another county other than at the seat of government.

OAG 69-196

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Bond of Auditor, amount and conditions, KRS

62.160

,

62.180

.

Election, term and qualifications of Auditor, Ky. Const., §§ 91, 93, 95.

Oath to be taken and bond given before entering on duties of office, KRS

62.010

,

62.050

.

Salary, KRS

64.480

.

43.030.
Assistant auditor — Subordinate personnel — Qualifications.

The Auditor shall appoint for the duration of his or her own term, subject to removal by the Auditor at any time, one (1) assistant auditor of public accounts, who shall be a certified public accountant and who has been a citizen and resident of the state for at least two (2) years. The assistant auditor shall have direct supervision over all technical work and technical assistants, and shall otherwise aid the Auditor in the performance of his or her duties, except that the assistant auditor of public accounts may exercise a full or partial recusal from this supervision requirement in regard to the consulting function authorized in KRS

43.050

if needed to comply with the professional standards of accountancy. If the Auditor is absent or is rendered incapable of performing his or her duties, or if a vacancy in the office occurs, the assistant auditor shall perform the duties of Auditor until the necessity therefor ceases to exist. He or she shall take the constitutional oath.

The Auditor may employ other subordinate personnel subject to the provisions of KRS

12.060

. All employees with status as defined in KRS

18A.005

who are engaged in auditing or investigations shall possess a minimum of a four (4) year college degree. No less than ninety percent (90%) of all employees engaged in financial auditing or financial investigations shall have twenty (20) semester hours or thirty (30) quarter hours of accounting, or alternately, shall be a certified public accountant. Not more than two (2) persons charged with the conduct of audits and investigations may substitute year-for-year responsible experience acceptable to the Personnel Cabinet for the required college education and accounting hours.

The Auditor and his or her sureties are liable on his or her official bond for the acts of the assistant auditor and clerks.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect the provisions of KRS

11.090

or other legislation authorizing audits.

History.

140 to 142, 147, 4618-137: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 27, § 44; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XI; 1968, ch. 152, § 19; 1976, ch. 329, § 1; 1980, ch. 177, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 39, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 154, § 63, effective July 15, 1998; 2019 ch. 18, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 59, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

43.040.
Duty of Auditor at end of term.

Upon the expiration of the Auditor’s term of office, the Auditor shall file a certification of the inventory of the office with the Secretary of State and shall deliver the inventory to the Auditor’s successor.

In the event of a vacancy in the office of Auditor, the assistant auditor of public accounts shall file a certification of the inventory of the office with the Secretary of State and shall deliver the inventory to the Auditor’s successor.

History.

141; 2020 ch. 59, § 3, effective July 15, 2020.

43.050.
General functions of Auditor.

The Auditor constitutes an agency independent of the administrative departments enumerated in KRS

12.020

, it being the policy of the General Assembly to provide for the independent auditing of the accounts, financial transactions, and performance of all spending agencies of the state through a disinterested auditor, who is entirely independent of the state administration whose affairs he is called upon to audit.

The Auditor may:

Audit annually, and at such other times as may be deemed expedient, the accounts of all state agencies, all private and semiprivate agencies receiving state aid or having responsibility for the handling of any state funds, the accounts, records, and transactions of the budget units, and the general accounts of the state;

Make a complete audit and verification of all moneys handled for the account of the state government by local officials charged with the collection of fees or other money for or on behalf of the state, when an audit is demanded in writing by the Legislative Research Commission, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or the Governor, and may make an audit when it is not so demanded;

Examine periodically the performance, management, conduct, and condition of all asylums, prisons, institutions for the intellectually disabled, and eleemosynary institutions; public works owned, operated, or partly owned by the state, or in the conduct or management of which the state has any financial interest or legal power; and state agencies. The examinations shall give special attention to the faithful and economical application of any money appropriated by the state to the institution, public works, or state agency examined, or of any money in which the state has an interest;

Examine annually the management and condition of the offices of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the State Treasurer, and the chief state school officer, to determine whether the laws regulating their duties are being fully complied with, and all money received by them for the state fully accounted for;

Examine, at least biennially, the Finance and Administration Cabinet’s compliance with this section and KRS

48.111

and

56.800

to

56.823

. Within sixty (60) days of the completion of each examination, the Auditor shall report his findings and recommendations to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee;

Audit periodically all state revenue collections, and, if he finds that collections are not being satisfactorily made, report that fact to the authority whose duty it is to make the collections;

Make special audits and investigations when required by the Governor;

Investigate the means of accounting for, controlling, and insuring the safe custody of all property of the state, and verify the existence and condition of such property charged to, or held in the custody of any state agency;

Audit the statements of financial condition and operations of the state government, and certify in writing the results of the audit and examination with the comments he deems necessary for the information of the General Assembly;

Report immediately in writing to the Governor, the Legislative Research Commission, and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, any unauthorized, illegal, irregular, or unsafe handling or expenditure of state funds, or other improper practice of financial administration, or evidence that any such handling, expenditure, or practice is contemplated, and any obstruction of the Auditor or his agents during the conduct of any audit or investigation of a state agency; and

Assist the Legislative Research Commission at hearings and investigations conducted by it and cooperate with the Legislative Research Commission in the preparation of its reports to the General Assembly.

The Auditor may investigate and examine into the conduct of all state and county officers who are authorized to receive, collect, or disburse any money for the state, or who manage or control any property belonging to the state or in which the state is interested, or who make estimates or records that are used as a basis by any state agency in the disbursement of public funds.

The Auditor may conduct a special audit or examination of a city government or any of its agencies or departments.

Except where otherwise provided, any expenses incurred by the Auditor for audits, examinations, investigations, or reviews shall be charged to the entity that is the subject of the audit, examination, investigation, or review. The Auditor shall maintain a record of all time expenses for each audit, examination, investigation, or review.

The Auditor may provide consulting services, in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States and government auditing standards, to state or local government entities and associations of such entities, including special purpose governmental entities, and may charge a mutually agreed upon rate for those services, including:

Providing training and technical presentations;

Developing audit guides applicable to those entities;

Developing question and answer documents to promote understanding of technical issues or standards; and

Collaborating with other professional organizations to advance auditing of government entities and programs.

The Auditor shall not be responsible for the keeping of any accounts of the state, except accounts relating to his own operations. The Auditor shall not be responsible for the collection of any money due the state, or for the handling or custody of any state funds or property except in the process of counting and verifying the amounts of the funds or property in the course of the audits provided for in this section.

History.

1992b-59, 4618-134, 4622, 4623: amend. Acts 1970, ch. 92, § 14; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, §§ 9(1) and 9(2); 1978, ch. 92, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 450, § 59, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 512, § 14, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 27, § 3, effective March 2, 1992; 1998, ch. 39, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 78, § 29, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 141, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2016 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2020 ch. 59, § 4, effective July 15, 2020.

43.060.
Annual investigation of accounts of Treasurer and Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The Auditor shall audit annually the Commonwealth’s Comprehensive Annual Financial Report, in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards, and may at any other time the Auditor thinks necessary audit or examine the books, accounts, and papers of the State Treasurer and the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.

1992b-60, 4630: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 2020 ch. 59, § 5, effective July 15, 2020.

43.070.
Audit of accounts of county officers and special purpose governmental entities — Agreed-upon procedures engagement for country clerks and sheriffs.

To determine whether any unauthorized, illegal, irregular, or unsafe handling or expenditure of revenue or other improper practice of financial administration has occurred and to assure that all proper items have been duly charged, taxed, and reported, the Auditor shall audit annually:

The funds contained in each county’s budget; and

The books, accounts, and papers of all county clerks and sheriffs.

The Auditor shall not conduct an audit pursuant to this subsection if the fiscal court or the elected official notifies the Auditor that a certified public accountant has been employed to audit the books, accounts, and papers of the county or the fee office, in accordance with KRS

64.810

.

If any county clerk or sheriff meets the criteria established in this subsection and any additional criteria established in administrative regulations promulgated by the Auditor, that county clerk’s or sheriff’s audit required by this section may, in the discretion of the Auditor, be conducted by an agreed-upon procedures engagement performed by the Auditor. If, in the discretion of the Auditor, an agreed-upon procedures engagement in progress will not provide sufficient oversight of the county clerk’s or sheriff’s office, the Auditor may at any time convert the engagement to an audit performed under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection. A county clerk or sheriff shall not be eligible for the agreed-upon procedures engagement as allowed in this paragraph for the first audit period after election if the county clerk or sheriff is serving in office for the first time, or is assuming the office after experiencing a break in sequential service in that position.

The Auditor and the county clerk or sheriff shall establish specific procedures for any agreed-upon procedures engagement. If the Auditor and the county clerk or sheriff cannot agree to the specific procedures for an agreed-upon procedures engagement, the audit of the county clerk’s or sheriff’s office shall be conducted under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection for that year subject to the audit.

At a minimum, the county clerk or sheriff shall meet the following criteria in order to be eligible to have the county clerk’s or sheriff’s annual audit in any particular year conducted using agreed-upon procedures:

The county clerk or sheriff applies to the Auditor to have an agreed-upon procedures engagement for the year subject to the audit on a form provided by the Auditor and by the application deadline established by the Auditor;

The county clerk’s or sheriff’s office did not have any reported audit comment or finding in its most recent audit report;

The county clerk or sheriff and the Auditor agree to specific procedures for the agreed-upon procedures engagement; and

Any additional criteria that may be determined by the Auditor.

The publication requirements related to an agreed-upon procedures engagement shall be the same as those required for audits of the county clerks and sheriffs performed under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection, except that the Auditor may provide a summary of the agreed-upon procedures engagement report, and publication of the summary shall satisfy the statutory requirements to publish the audit report, opinion letter, and transmittal letter.

The billing and expense provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall apply to any agreed-upon procedures engagement performed under this section.

The Auditor may promulgate administrative regulations that set forth additional criteria to qualify for agreed-upon procedures engagements, the application procedures, and the standards, procedures, guidelines, and reporting requirements for agreed-upon procedures engagements under this section.

In exercising discretion regarding whether a county clerk or sheriff who otherwise meets the minimum requirements may have an agreed-upon procedures engagement in lieu of an audit for any particular year subject to an engagement, and in exercising discretion regarding the proposed procedures for the agreed-upon procedures engagement for any particular year subject to an audit, the Auditor may consider factors including but not limited to past audit comments or agreed-upon procedures engagement findings, assessment of risks, complaints, financial statements, the number of consecutive agreed-upon procedures engagements performed of the county clerk or sheriff, and other factors relevant to oversight of the county clerk’s or sheriff’s office.

The Auditor may audit:

The books, accounts and papers of all county judges/executive, county attorneys, coroners and constables; and

The books, accounts, papers, and performance of all special purpose governmental entities as defined in KRS

65A.010

. The expense of any audit or examination performed pursuant to this paragraph shall be borne by the entity audited or examined.

The county shall bear one-half (1/2) of the actual expense of the audit conducted pursuant to subsection (1)(a)1. of this section and shall bear the total actual expense of the audit conducted pursuant to subsections (1)(a)2. and (2)(a) of this section. No county shall be required to bear the expense for more than one (1) audit of the same fund or office annually pursuant to subsection (1)(a)1. or 2. of this section, except as provided in KRS 64.810(4).

Within a reasonable time after the completion and distribution of the audit reports authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the Auditor of Public Accounts shall bill the county for the expenses incurred pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. A copy of this bill shall be forwarded to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Should the fiscal court within sixty (60) days following receipt of said bill determine the charge to be excessive or otherwise improper it shall submit its objection to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and to the State Treasurer for resolution of the controversy in accordance with subsection (5) of this section. If the amount billed has not been paid within sixty (60) days from date of billing, and no objection has been filed, the Auditor shall notify the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the secretary of revenue who shall cause said amount to be deducted from the next payment or return of moneys provided by KRS

47.110

by the state to the county or counties. Deductions shall continue until the total amount due the Auditor’s office has been paid. All moneys received pursuant to this section shall be credited to the trust and agency account of the Auditor of Public Accounts. When an objection to the bill has been filed with the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the State Treasurer in accordance with subsection (5) of this section the amount found to be equitable and just shall become payable immediately upon the entry of the final decision.

Any controversy over the amount of the bill for the actual expenses incurred shall be submitted by the fiscal court to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the State Treasurer for a decision as to the proper amount. In the event that these two (2) arbitrators fail to agree, then the controversy shall be submitted to the Attorney General, whose decision shall be final.

HISTORY:

4636-1: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 185; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1974, ch. 254, § 8; 1976, ch. 229, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 12, effective January 2, 1978; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 197, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 121, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 37, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 51, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2013, ch. 40, § 18, effective March 21, 2013; 2018 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 22, (6) at 1647.

43.071.
Annual audit of county clerk’s motor vehicle and motorboat tax receipts.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall annually audit each county clerk concerning:

All receipts due from the collection of motor vehicle and motorboat registration fees, motor vehicle and motorboat licenses and other receipts due the clerk pertaining to motor vehicles and motorboats as prescribed in KRS Chapters 186, 186A and 235;

All receipts due from the collection of motor vehicle usage tax as prescribed by KRS

138.460

; and

All receipts due from the collection of the ad valorem tax on motor vehicles and motorboats as prescribed by KRS

134.800

.

These annual audits shall be completed by April 15 of the year following the year to be audited.

The provisions of KRS

43.070

shall not apply to the separate and distinct duties imposed on the Auditor of Public Accounts pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The audits specified in subsection (1) of this section shall be conducted prior to the audits mandated by KRS

43.070

.

Immediately upon completion of each audit, the Auditor of Public Accounts shall prepare a report of his findings noting any indebtedness to the Commonwealth. He shall furnish one (1) copy to the county clerk, one (1) copy to the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, one (1) copy to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and one (1) copy to the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet. If the county clerk objects to any findings of indebtedness in the Auditor’s report, he shall file a written response with the Auditor within ten (10) days of his receipt of the report. The Auditor shall consider the written response and within thirty (30) days of its receipt issue a final report. If the county clerk wishes to object to any findings of indebtedness contained in the final report, he shall file a request within ten (10) days of his receipt of the final report for a hearing before a three (3) member panel composed of the secretary of transportation or his designee, the commissioner of the Department of Revenue or his designee, and the president of the Kentucky County Clerks Association or his designee. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B. The majority decision of this panel shall be determinative of any indebtedness to the Commonwealth. If the county clerk wishes to appeal the decision of this panel, he shall file the appeal in the Circuit Court for the county where he serves in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 429, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 163, § 17, effective January 1, 1990; 1996, ch. 318, § 27, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 85, § 58, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 36, effective July 15, 2010.

43.073.
Annual audit of school district entity by Auditor or private accountant — Expenses — Review of private audit by Auditor.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall be responsible for an annual audit of the funds contained in each school district cooperative, school district consortium, school district corporation, and any other entity formed by school districts in an agreement made pursuant to KRS

65.210

to

65.300

, with the cost of the audit to be borne by the audited entity.

A school district cooperative, school district consortium, school district corporation, or other entity formed by school districts in an agreement made pursuant to KRS

65.210

to

65.300

may employ a certified public accountant to audit the books, accounts, and papers of the cooperative, consortium, corporation, or other entity in lieu of the audit required by subsection (1) of this section, if the Auditor of Public Accounts declines in writing to assume responsibility for performing the audit or fails to respond in writing within thirty (30) days of receiving the cooperative’s, consortium’s, corporation’s, or other entity’s written notice of its intent to employ a certified public accountant to conduct the audit. The cooperative, consortium, corporation, or other entity shall not enter into any contract with a certified public accountant for an audit unless the Auditor of Public Accounts has declined in writing to assume responsibility for performing the audit or has failed to respond within thirty (30) days of receipt of a written request for an audit.

Any contract with a certified public accountant entered into as a result of the Auditor of Public Accounts either declining to assume responsibility of performing the audit or failing to respond within thirty (30) days of receipt of a written request for an audit shall specify the following:

That the certified public accountant shall forward a copy of the audit report and management letters to the Auditor of Public Accounts for review;

That the Auditor of Public Accounts shall have the right to review the certified public accountant’s work papers before and after the release of the audit; and

That after review of the certified public accountant’s work papers, if discrepancies are found, the Auditor of Public Accounts shall notify the audited entity of the discrepancies. If the certified public accountant does not correct these discrepancies prior to the release of the audit, the Auditor of Public Accounts may conduct its own audit to verify the findings of the certified public accountant’s report.

If an audit verifying the findings of the certified public accountant’s report is conducted by the Auditor of Public Accounts, the total audit expense incurred by the audited entity shall be an allowable expenditure and shall be paid by the audited entity to the Auditor of Public Accounts. If the audit conducted by the Auditor of Public Accounts discloses discrepancies in the audit by the certified public accountant, the findings of the Auditor of Public Accounts shall be deemed official for all purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 491, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

43.075.
Uniform standards and procedures.

The Auditor shall develop uniform standards and procedures for conducting, and uniform formats for reporting, all audits of county budgets and the accounts, books and papers of elected county or district officials performed under KRS 43.070(1)(a)1. and 2. or (1)(b) or

64.810

. The Auditor shall promulgate the uniform standards and procedures by administrative regulation according to KRS Chapter 13A.

Upon and after July 15, 1986, no person shall conduct an audit under KRS 43.070(1)(a)1. and 2. or (1)(b) or

64.810

which does not comply with the standards and procedures promulgated by the state Auditor of Public Accounts under subsection (1) of this section.

The uniform audit standards and procedures promulgated by the Auditor shall include but need not be limited to the requirement that each person performing an audit shall determine whether the fiscal court or county official is complying with the requirements of the uniform system of accounts adopted under KRS

68.210

, whether there is accurate recording of receipts by source and expenditures by payee, and whether or not each official is complying with all other legal requirements relating to the management of public funds by his office, including all publication requirements. The requirements for uniform formats for audit reports shall require that the format of reports for each category of county or district office shall be uniform.

The Auditor shall make informational copies of the regulations containing the audit standards and procedures available to interested persons at their request, and may charge a reasonable fee for such copies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 49, § 1; 1986, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 2013, ch. 40, § 19, effective March 21, 2013.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Auditor of Public Accounts is an administrative officer, not a legal officer, and must observe the inherent limitations of KRS

43.050

,

43.070

,

43.090

and this section.

OAG 82-333

.

43.080.
Access to books and records — Power to obtain testimony.

The Auditor and his authorized agents shall have access to and may examine all books, accounts, reports, vouchers, correspondence files, records, money and property of any state agency. Every officer or employee of any such agency having such records or property in his possession or under his control shall permit access to and examination of them upon the request of the Auditor or any agent authorized by him to make such request.

The Auditor and his assistants shall have access at all times to the papers, books and records of the asylums, prisons, institutions for the intellectually disabled and eleemosynary institutions, and public works that he is authorized to examine, and of any county officer who receives or disburses county funds.

The Auditor may require information on oath from any person touching any matters relative to any account that the Auditor is required to state, audit or settle. The Auditor may administer the oath himself, or have it done by any officer authorized to administer an oath.

The Auditor and his assistants may issue process and compel the attendance of witnesses before them, and administer oaths and compel witnesses to testify in any of the investigations the Auditor is authorized to make.

History.

150, 4618-136, 4625, 4636-1: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 92, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 2010, ch. 141, § 4, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section would not authorize the Auditor to subpoena construction plans in the possession of an individual stockholder of a construction company.

OAG 77-436

.

43.090.
Reports of audits and investigations — Implementation by agency of audit recommendation.

Immediately upon completion of each audit and investigation, except those provided for in KRS

43.070

, the Auditor shall prepare a report of his or her findings and recommendations. He or she shall furnish one (1) copy of the report to the head of the agency to which the report pertains, one (1) copy to the Governor, one (1) copy to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, one (1) copy to the Legislative Research Commission, and one (1) copy to the state librarian. The agency to which an Auditor’s draft report pertains shall respond in writing to any adverse or critical audit findings and to any recommendations contained in the draft report within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the draft report. The Auditor shall distribute the agency’s response to those entitled by this subsection to a copy of the audit report. Within sixty (60) days of the completion of the final audit or examination report, the agency to which an Auditor’s report pertains shall notify the Legislative Research Commission and the Auditor of the audit recommendations it has implemented and of the audit recommendations it has not implemented. The agency shall state the reasons for its failure to implement any recommendation made in the final audit or examination report. All audit reports and agency responses shall be, subject to KRS

61.870

to

61.884

, posted online in a publicly searchable format.

The Auditor shall, within a reasonable time after the examination of each county as provided in KRS

43.070

, make a written report to the Governor, the General Assembly, the Attorney General, the state librarian, and the fiscal court and county attorney of the county examined, calling attention in specific terms to any mismanagement, misconduct, misapplication or illegal appropriation, or extravagant use of money received or disbursed by any officer of the county examined. In addition, said report shall be sent to a newspaper having general circulation in the county examined, and the letter of transmittal accompanying the report shall be published in said newspaper in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 424. All audit reports and responses shall be, subject to KRS

61.870

to

61.884

, posted online in a publicly searchable format.

History.

1992b-59, 4618-135, 4636-4: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 139, §§ 1, 2; 1966, ch. 255, § 52; 1974, ch. 254, § 9; 1982, ch. 176, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 2007, ch. 47, § 25, effective June 26, 2007; 2020 ch. 59, § 6, effective July 15, 2020.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The State Auditor has the primary responsibility for sending a written audit report of county officials and the letter of transmittal to a newspaper having general circulation in the county examined, and if the audit concerns the county’s budget then the Auditor’s office will have to pay one-half of the publication cost.

OAG 76-204

.

Although this section makes audits “public documents,” under KRS

61.878

(f) these documents would not be available for public inspection, if they were to be the basis for a criminal prosecution, until after the criminal action was resolved.

OAG 78-816

.

This section, in providing that audit and investigative reports are public documents, in effect amends KRS

61.870

(2) which defines “public records,” since this section, as amended in 1978, is later legislation (KRS

61.870

was enacted in 1976) and constitutes specific as contrasted with general legislation.

OAG 78-816

.

It is not necessary that the letter of transmittal published under this section should contain notes accompanying the financial statement (audit).

OAG 79-103

.

The letter of transmittal required by subsection (2) of this section should merely serve the purpose of alerting the public to the fact that an audit of the county funds has been completed and that a copy is on file with the clerk of fiscal court.

OAG 79-103

.

The publication of a letter of transmittal under this section or even an Auditor’s report of audit in no way serves to cancel out the county treasurer’s duty to publish his or her report under KRS

424.220

.

OAG 79-103

.

The Auditor of Public Accounts is an administrative officer, not a legal officer, and must observe the inherent limitations of KRS

43.050

,

43.070

,

43.075

and this section.

OAG 82-333

.

43.200.
Auditor’s scholarships in accounting.

There is hereby created in the Auditor of Public Accounts office a scholarship program for economically disadvantaged students planning to major in accounting at Kentucky institutions of higher education agreeing to provide matching funds.

Up to four (4) students each year may be selected by the Auditor as eligible to receive a scholarship for up to four (4) years while pursuing an accounting degree. Each individual scholarship shall be subject to review annually.

The annual scholarship amount shall be set by the Auditor in an amount required to cover the average cost of room, board, tuition, and fees at Kentucky public institutions, as well as living expenses. In addition, the scholarship shall include full-time summer employment with the Auditor’s office.

Upon receiving their accounting degree, recipients of the scholarship shall be required to work one (1) year for the Auditor’s office for each year they received the scholarship.

Recipients failing to complete an accounting program or failing to fulfill the service requirement shall become liable to the Auditor’s office for the sum of all scholarship funds received plus interest for the entire period. The rate of interest shall be determined when the scholarship is awarded. The debt may be deferred for cause by the Auditor and a schedule for repayment may be established.

The Auditor’s office shall execute appropriate contracts and promissory notes with scholarship recipients.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 358, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2020 ch. 59, § 7, effective July 15, 2020.

43.990.
Penalties.

Any officer who prevents, attempts to prevent or obstructs an examination by the Auditor, under the provisions of paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of KRS

43.050

, or of subsection (3) of KRS

43.050

, into his official conduct, or the conduct or condition of the office in his charge or with which he is connected, except when the office constitutes a state agency, is guilty of a high misdemeanor, and, upon conviction on indictment in the Franklin Circuit Court, shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) and removed by the Governor. Any person, other than an officer, who prevents, attempts to prevent or obstructs such an examination shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000).

If the Auditor fails or refuses without good cause to perform the duties imposed upon him by KRS

43.060

, he shall be fined not less than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.

Any county officer who prevents, attempts to prevent or obstructs an examination by the Auditor, under KRS

43.070

, into his official conduct, or the conduct or condition of the office in his charge or with which he is connected, is guilty of a high misdemeanor, and shall, upon indictment and conviction in the Franklin Circuit Court, be fined five hundred dollars ($500). Any person, other than a county officer, who prevents, attempts to prevent or obstructs such an examination shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Any officer or other person who fails or refuses to permit the access and examination provided for in subsection (1) of KRS

43.080

, or who interferes with such examination, shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100), or imprisoned in the county jail for not less than one (1) month nor more than twelve (12) months, or both. Each refusal by an officer shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who has custody of any papers, books or records of an asylum, prison, institution for the intellectually disabled or eleemosynary institution or public works, other than a state agency, that the Auditor is authorized to examine under paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of KRS

43.050

, under subsection (3) of KRS

43.050

, and under subsection (2) of KRS

43.080

, who fails or refuses, when called upon by the Auditor for that purpose, to permit him to inspect any of such papers, books or records, shall, upon conviction on indictment in the Franklin Circuit Court, be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) and be subject to removal by the Governor.

Any person who refuses to be sworn when required by the Auditor to be sworn for the purpose mentioned in subsection (3) of KRS

43.080

shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any witness called by the Auditor under subsection (4) of KRS

43.080

who fails, without legal excuse, to attend or testify shall be fined not more than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250).

History.

150, 4618-136, 4625, 4626, 4628, 4629, 4635, 4636-2, 4636-3: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 92, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 348, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 141, § 5, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A county attorney, who submitted to a 1973 audit in early 1974 and made settlement with the fiscal court for the deficiency in May, 1974, properly refused to submit to a duplicate audit by the State Auditor’s office in 1975 and there was no violation of this section since the intent of this chapter is to avoid unnecessary duplicate audits.

OAG 75-112

.